Maryland, session 2026, HB1394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
2–503.
(a) A person may not cause the death of another as a result of the person’s
negligently driving, operating, or controlling a motor vehicle or vessel while:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1394*

HOUSE BILL 1394
(1) under the influence of alcohol; or
(2) under the influence of alcohol per se.
2–504.
(a) A person may not cause the death of another as a result of the person’s
negligently driving, operating, or controlling a motor vehicle or vessel while impaired by
alcohol.
2–505.
(a) A person may not cause the death of another as a result of the person’s
negligently driving, operating, or controlling a motor vehicle or vessel while the person is
so far impaired by a drug, a combination of drugs, or a combination of one or more drugs
and alcohol that the person cannot drive, operate, or control a motor vehicle or vessel safely.
2–506.
(a) A person may not cause the death of another as a result of the person’s
negligently driving, operating, or controlling a motor vehicle or vessel while the person is
impaired by a controlled dangerous substance, as defined in § 5–101 of this article.
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–606.1.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT SHALL
ORDER AN INDIVIDUAL CONVICTED OF A VIOLATION OF AN OFFENSE UNDER TITLE
2, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE RESULTING IN THE DEATH OF A
PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A CHILD TO PAY RESTITUTION TO THE CHILD.
(B) (1) IN DETERMINING THE AMOUNT OF RESTITUTION ORDERED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER THE
CHILD’S:
(I) FINANCIAL NEEDS AND RESOURCES;
(II) STANDARD OF LIVING;
(III) PHYSICAL AND EMOTIONAL CONDITION AND NEEDS; AND
(IV) PHYSICAL AND LEGAL CUSTODY ARRANGEMENTS.

HOUSE BILL 1394 3
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE CONSIDERATIONS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, IF THE CHILD OF THE VICTIM HAS A SURVIVING PARENT OR
GUARDIAN, THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) THE FINANCIAL NEEDS AND RESOURCES OF THE PARENT OR
GUARDIAN, INCLUDING WHETHER THE CHILD IS IN THE CUSTODY OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES; AND
(II) REASONABLE WORK–RELATED CHILD CARE EXPENSES.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE FULL
AMOUNT OF RESTITUTION ORDERED BY THE COURT SHALL BE DIVIDED INTO
PERIODIC PAYMENTS TO BE PAID TO A CHILD OF THE VICTIM UNTIL:
(I) THE CHILD REACHES THE AGE OF 18 YEARS AND HAS
GRADUATED FROM A SECONDARY SCHOOL; OR
(II) THE MAJORITY OF THE CLASS OF WHICH THE CHILD IS A
MEMBER WHEN THE CHILD REACHES THE AGE OF 18 YEARS HAS GRADUATED FROM
SECONDARY SCHOOL.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, IF
AN INDIVIDUAL ORDERED TO PAY RESTITUTION UNDER THIS SECTION IS
INCARCERATED AND UNABLE TO PAY, PAYMENT SHALL BEGIN WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER
THE INDIVIDUAL’S RELEASE FROM INCARCERATION.
(II) IF THE PERIOD OF RESTITUTION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION ENDS WHILE THE INDIVIDUAL ORDERED TO PAY RESTITUTION IS
INCARCERATED AND THE RESTITUTION IS NOT PAID IN FULL, PAYMENT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL CONTINUE UNTIL THE RESTITUTION IS PAID IN FULL.
(D) (1) IF THE SURVIVING PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A CHILD OF THE
VICTIM BRINGS AN ACTION AGAINST THE INDIVIDUAL SEEKING DAMAGES BEFORE
AN ORDER OF RESTITUTION IS ENTERED UNDER THIS SECTION, AND THE PARENT OR
GUARDIAN OBTAINS A FAVORABLE JUDGMENT, THE COURT MAY NOT ORDER
RESTITUTION.
(2) IF THE SURVIVING PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A CHILD OF THE
VICTIM BRINGS AN ACTION AGAINST THE INDIVIDUAL AFTER AN ORDER OF
RESTITUTION IS ENTERED UNDER THIS SECTION, AND THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN
OBTAINS A FAVORABLE JUDGMENT, THE COURT SHALL OFFSET THE RESTITUTION
BY THE AMOUNT OF THE FAVORABLE JUDGMENT.

HOUSE BILL 1394
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.